Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.120

Fallen firefighter memorial.

(1) A memorial is established on the capitol campus to honor firefighters who have died in the line of duty. The design and construction of such a memorial must follow the major works requirements administered by the department of enterprise services.

(2) The state capitol committee, or any subcommittee thereof, must work with the department of natural resources and statewide organizations representing firefighters in its role reviewing the building of the fallen firefighter memorial.

[ 2024 c 65 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 65: "The legislature intends to establish a fallen firefighter memorial on the capitol campus grounds to recognize the sacrifice of firefighters who have died in the line of duty giving unselfish service to their communities and the state." [ 2024 c 65 s 1.]